Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1110
Indirect supervision, defined.

Indirect supervision means supervision when the licensed dentist authorizes the procedure to be performed by a dental hygienist or dental assistant and the licensed dentist is physically present on the premises when such procedure is being performed by the dental hygienist pursuant to section 38-1132 or the dental assistant.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 443.